District of Columbia statutes.
49-1006

Rulemaking.

In accordance with subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, the Mayor is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to implement this chapter.

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 707, 48 DCR 6981

History

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 707 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).

Emergency Legislation